src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#guđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#guđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#guđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#guđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#guđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#guđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GOLBMACIHCCETLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#čihččet#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#čihččet#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#čihččet#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#čihččet#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#čihččet#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#čihččet#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#čihččet#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#čihččet#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#čihččet#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GOLBMAGAVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#gávccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#gávccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#gávccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GOLBMAOVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#ovccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#ovccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#ovccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
golbmaguđátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaguđatlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
golbmačihččetlohkái:golbma GOLBMACIHCCETLOHKAI ;
golbmagávccátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
golbmaovccátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
golbmaguđátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaguđatlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
golbmačihččetlohkái:golbma GOLBMACIHCCETLOHKAI ;
golbmagávccátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
golbmaovccátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
